Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5122
Investments held on September 13, 1997.

Any investment held by an insurer on September 13, 1997, which was an authorized investment immediately prior to such date shall be deemed an authorized investment under the Insurers Investment Act.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 22;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 11.